Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.040

Commission to examine absent witness.

Every such chair or presiding member shall also have power, under the direction of the committee, to issue a commission for the examination of any witness who shall be without the jurisdiction of the state, or if within the state, shall be unable to attend, or who shall, for any reasons, be excused by the committee from attendance.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6005; 1895 c 6 s 3; RRS s 8180.]